Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CLEAN WATER APPROPRIATIONS; GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total appropriation. new text end new text begin $225,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for the purposes of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Emerging contaminants grants. new text end new text begin $22,000,000 of this appropriation is for the emerging contaminants grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 446A.082. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin State match for revolving loan funds. new text end new text begin $19,000,000 of this appropriation is to match federal capitalization grants for the clean water revolving fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 446A.07, and the drinking water revolving fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 446A.081. This appropriation must be used for qualified capital projects. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Water infrastructure funding program. new text end new text begin $60,000,000 of this appropriation is for grants to eligible municipalities under the water infrastructure funding program under Minnesota Statutes, section 446A.072. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Point source implementation grants program. new text end new text begin $124,000,000 of this appropriation is for grants to eligible municipalities under the point source implementation grants program under Minnesota Statutes, section 446A.073. This appropriation must be used for qualified capital projects. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $225,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end